Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
SAVING PROVISIONS

7-137-301. Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the repeal of any provision of the "Colorado Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 20 to 29 of this title, does not affect:

The operation of the statute, or any action taken under it, before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the provision before its repeal;

Any violation of the provision, or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding or reorganization commenced under the provision before its repeal, and the proceeding or reorganization may be completed in accordance with the provision as if it had not been repealed.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section or in sections 7-137-101 (1)(b) and 7-137-102 (4) for the reinstatement, as provided in part 10 of article 90 of this title, of a corporate entity suspended, declared defunct, or administratively dissolved before July 1, 1998, any dissolution commenced under the provision before its repeal may be completed in accordance with the provision as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of any provision of the "Colorado Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 20 to 29 of this title, is reduced by articles 121 to 137 of this title, the penalty or punishment, if not already imposed, shall be imposed in accordance with said articles.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2355, § 343, effective July 1, 2004.